Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3120
Temporary practice pending licensure permitted; when; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) A psychologist licensed under the laws of another jurisdiction may be authorized by the department to practice psychology for a maximum of one year if the psychologist has made application to the department for licensure and has met the educational and experience requirements for licensure in Nebraska, if the requirements for licensure in the former jurisdiction are equal to or exceed the requirements for licensure in Nebraska, and if the psychologist is not the subject of a past or pending disciplinary action in another jurisdiction. Denial of licensure shall terminate this authorization.

(2) An applicant for licensure as a psychologist who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 85;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.23;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1054;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 88.